src/fst/morphology/affixes/verbs.lexc
LEXICON св_нп_a_есть
+V+Perf+IV:ед Perf_Inf_V_stem ;
! +V+Perf+IV+Fut+Sg1:ем # ;
! +V+Perf+IV+Fut+Sg2:ешь # ;
! +V+Perf+IV+Fut+Sg3:ест # ;
! +V+Perf+IV+Fut+Pl1:едим # ;
! +V+Perf+IV+Fut+Pl2:едите # ;
! +V+Perf+IV+Fut+Pl3:едят # ;
+V+Perf+IV:еш Imper_unstressed ;
! +V+Perf+IV+Imp+Pl1:едим # ;

LEXICON св_b_есть
св_нп_b_есть ;
+V+Perf+TV:е́д Perf_Inf_V_stem ;
! +V+Perf+TV+Fut+Sg1:е́м # ;
! +V+Perf+TV+Fut+Sg2:е́шь # ;
! +V+Perf+TV+Fut+Sg3:е́ст # ;
! +V+Perf+TV+Fut+Pl1:еди́м # ;
! +V+Perf+TV+Fut+Pl2:еди́те # ;
! +V+Perf+TV+Fut+Pl3:едя́т # ;
+V+Perf+TV:е́ш Imper_unstressed ;
! +V+Perf+TV+Imp+Pl1:еди́м # ;

LEXICON св_нп_b_есть
+V+Perf+IV:е́д Perf_Inf_V_stem ;
! +V+Perf+IV+Fut+Sg1:е́м # ;
! +V+Perf+IV+Fut+Sg2:е́шь # ;
! +V+Perf+IV+Fut+Sg3:е́ст # ;
! +V+Perf+IV+Fut+Pl1:еди́м # ;
! +V+Perf+IV+Fut+Pl2:еди́те # ;
! +V+Perf+IV+Fut+Pl3:едя́т # ;
+V+Perf+IV:е́ш Imper_unstressed ;
! +V+Perf+IV+Imp+Pl1:еди́м # ;

LEXICON нсв_a_R_зиждиться
+V+Impf+IV:и Impf_Inf_stem_R ;
+V+Impf+IV: Impf_Pres_1_stem_R ;

LEXICON нсв_a?_зыбить
+V+Impf+IV:и Impf_Inf_V_stem ;
+V+Impf+IV: Impf_Pres_1_mut_stem ;
+V+Impf+TV:и Impf_Inf_V_stem ;
+V+Impf+TV: Impf_Pres_1_mut_stem ;

LEXICON нсв_a_R_зыбиться
+V+Impf+IV:и Impf_Inf_stem_R ;
+V+Impf+IV: Impf_Pres_1_mut_stem_R ;

LEXICON нсв_b/c_клясть
+V+Impf+IV:н Impf_Pres_1_end ;
+V+Impf+TV:н Impf_Pres_1_end ;
+V+Impf+IV+Inf:%<сть # ;
+V+Impf+IV: Past_shift ;
+V+Impf+IV: Impf_PastVrbAdv_V ;
+V+Impf+IV: PastAct ;
+V+Impf+TV+Inf:%<сть # ;
+V+Impf+TV: Past_shift ;
+V+Impf+TV: Impf_PastVrbAdv_V ;
+V+Impf+TV: PastAct ;

LEXICON нсв_b/c''_R_клясться
+V+Impf+IV:н Impf_Pres_1_end_R ;
+V+Impf+IV+Inf:%<сться # ;
+V+Impf+IV: Past_shift_R ;
+V+Impf+IV: Impf_PastVrbAdv_R ;
+V+Impf+IV: PastAct_R ;

LEXICON св_b/c_-клясть
+V+Perf+IV:н Perf_Fut_1_end ;
+V+Perf+IV:д Perf_Inf_V_shift ;
+V+Perf+TV:н Perf_Fut_1_end ;
+V+Perf+TV:д Perf_Inf_V_shift ;
+V+Perf+TV: PastPass_stem ;

LEXICON св_b/c1_-клясть
+V+Perf+IV:я́н Perf_Fut_1_end ;
+V+Perf+IV: Perf_Inf_V_shift1_яд ;
+V+Perf+TV:я́н Perf_Fut_1_end ;
+V+Perf+TV: Perf_Inf_V_shift1_яд ;
+V+Perf+TV:я PastPass_stem ;

LEXICON св_b/c''_R_-клясться
+V+Perf+IV:н Perf_Fut_1_end_R ;
+V+Perf+IV:д Perf_Inf_shift''_R ;

!- - - - - - - Miscellaneous stem types: Lexicalized participles- - - - - - - 

LEXICON св_b/c'_дать_Lxc ! simplex дать
+V+Perf+IV+Inf:да́ть # ;
+V+Perf+IV:да́ Past_shift' ;
+V+Perf+IV:да́ Perf_PastVrbAdv_V ;
+V+Perf+IV:да́ PastAct ;
! +V+Perf+IV+Fut+Sg1:да́м # ;
! +V+Perf+IV+Fut+Sg2:да́шь # ;
! +V+Perf+IV+Fut+Sg3:да́ст # ;
! +V+Perf+IV+Fut+Pl1:дади́м # ;
! +V+Perf+IV+Fut+Pl2:дади́те # ;
! +V+Perf+IV+Fut+Pl3:даду́т # ;
! +V+Perf+IV+Imp+Pl1:дади́м # ;
+V+Perf+IV:да́ Imper_stressed ;
+V+Perf+TV+Inf:да́ть # ;
+V+Perf+TV:да́ Past_shift' ;
+V+Perf+TV:да́ Perf_PastVrbAdv_V ;
+V+Perf+TV:да́ PastAct ;
! +V+Perf+TV+Fut+Sg1:да́м # ;
! +V+Perf+TV+Fut+Sg2:да́шь # ;
! +V+Perf+TV+Fut+Sg3:да́ст # ;
! +V+Perf+TV+Fut+Pl1:дади́м # ;
! +V+Perf+TV+Fut+Pl2:дади́те # ;
! +V+Perf+TV+Fut+Pl3:даду́т # ;
! +V+Perf+TV+Imp+Pl1:дади́м # ;
+V+Perf+TV:да́ Imper_stressed ;
+V+Perf+TV:да́ PastPass_нн_stem_Lxc ;

LEXICON св_b/c1_-клясть_Lxc
+V+Perf+IV:я́н Perf_Fut_1_end ;
+V+Perf+IV: Perf_Inf_V_shift1_яд_Lxc ;
+V+Perf+TV:я́н Perf_Fut_1_end ;
+V+Perf+TV: Perf_Inf_V_shift1_яд_Lxc ;
+V+Perf+TV:я PastPass_stem_Lxc ;

LEXICON св_b/c[1]_дать_Lxc
+V+Perf+IV+Inf:да́ть # ;
+V+Perf+IV:да́ Past_shift ;
+V+Perf+IV:да́ Perf_PastVrbAdv_V ;
+V+Perf+IV:да́ PastAct ;
! +V+Perf+IV+Fut+Sg1:да́м # ;
! +V+Perf+IV+Fut+Sg2:да́шь # ;
! +V+Perf+IV+Fut+Sg3:да́ст # ;
! +V+Perf+IV+Fut+Pl1:дади́м # ;
! +V+Perf+IV+Fut+Pl2:дади́те # ;
! +V+Perf+IV+Fut+Pl3:даду́т # ;
! +V+Perf+IV+Imp+Pl1:дади́м # ;
+V+Perf+IV:да́ Imper_stressed ;
+V+Perf+TV+Inf:да́ть # ;
+V+Perf+TV:да́ Past_shift ;
+V+Perf+TV:да́ Perf_PastVrbAdv_V ;
+V+Perf+TV:да́ PastAct ;
! +V+Perf+TV+Fut+Sg1:да́м # ;
! +V+Perf+TV+Fut+Sg2:да́шь # ;
! +V+Perf+TV+Fut+Sg3:да́ст # ;
! +V+Perf+TV+Fut+Pl1:дади́м # ;
! +V+Perf+TV+Fut+Pl2:дади́те # ;
! +V+Perf+TV+Fut+Pl3:даду́т # ;
! +V+Perf+TV+Imp+Pl1:дади́м # ;
+V+Perf+TV:да́ Imper_stressed ;
+V+Perf+TV:да PastPass_нн_stem_Lxc ;


!=========================================================================================
!=========================================================================================
!                                  Paradigm fragments below
!=========================================================================================
!=========================================================================================


LEXICON Impf_Inf_C_stem
+Inf:%<ть # ;
Past_stem ;
Impf_PastVrbAdv_C ;
PastAct ;

LEXICON Impf_Inf_C_stem_w/Pass
Impf_Inf_C_stem ;
+Inf+Pass:%<ться # ;
Past_stem_Pass ;
PastAct_Pass ;

LEXICON Impf_Inf_V_stem
+Inf:%<ть # ;
Past_stem ;
Impf_PastVrbAdv_V ;
PastAct ;

LEXICON Impf_Inf_V_stem_Fac
+Inf+Fac:%<ть # ;
Past_stem_Fac ;
Impf_PastVrbAdv_V_Fac ;
PastAct_Fac ;

LEXICON Impf_Inf_V_stem_безл.
+Inf:%<ть # ;
Past_stem_безл. ;

LEXICON Impf_Inf_V_stem_w/Pass
Impf_Inf_V_stem ;
+Inf+Pass:%<ться # ;
Past_stem_Pass ;
PastAct_Pass ;

LEXICON Impf_Inf_stem_R
+Inf:%<ться # ;
Past_stem_R ;
Impf_PastVrbAdv_R ;
PastAct_R ;

LEXICON Impf_Inf_stem_R_Fac
+Inf+Fac:%<ться # ;
Past_stem_R_Fac ;
Impf_PastVrbAdv_R ; ! already Fac
PastAct_R_Fac ;

LEXICON Impf_Inf_stem_R_безл.
+Inf:%<ться # ;
Past_stem_R_безл. ;

LEXICON Impf_Inf_C_end
+Inf:%<ть # ;
Past_end ;
Impf_PastVrbAdv_C ;
PastAct ;

LEXICON Impf_Infи_C_end
+Inf:%<ти́ # ;
Past_end ;
Impf_PastVrbAdv_C ;
PastAct ;

LEXICON Impf_Infи_C_end_w/Pass
+Inf:%<ти́ # ;
Past_end_Pass ;
Impf_PastVrbAdv_C ;
PastAct_Pass ;

LEXICON Impf_Infи_C_end9
+Inf:%<ти́ # ;
Past_end ;
Impf_PastVrbAdv_9_end ;
PastAct ;

LEXICON Impf_Inf_C_end_w/Pass
Impf_Inf_C_end ;
+Inf+Pass:%<ться # ;
Past_end_R ;      ! Should be Past_end_Pass (doesn't exist).
PastAct_Pass ;

LEXICON Impf_Inf_V_end
+Inf:%<ть # ;
Past_end ;
Impf_PastVrbAdv_V ;
PastAct ;

LEXICON Impf_Inf_V_end_w/Pass
Impf_Inf_V_end ;
+Inf+Pass:%<ться # ;
Past_end_R ;     ! Should be Past_end_Pass (doesn't exist).
PastAct_Pass ;

LEXICON Impf_Inf_end_R
+Inf:%<ться # ;
Past_end_R ;
Impf_PastVrbAdv_R ;
PastAct_R ;

LEXICON Impf_Inf_end_R_безл.
+Inf:%<ться # ;
Past_end_R_безл. ;

LEXICON Impf_Infи_end_R
+Inf:%<ти́сь # ;
Past_end_R ;
Impf_PastVrbAdv_R ;
PastAct_R ;

LEXICON Impf_Inf_C_shift
+Inf:%<ть # ;
Past_shift ;
Impf_PastVrbAdv_C ;
PastAct ;

LEXICON Impf_Inf_C_shift_w/Pass
Impf_Inf_C_shift ;
+Inf+Pass:%<ться # ;
Past_shift''_Pass ;
PastAct_Pass ;

LEXICON Impf_Inf_V_shift
+Inf:%<ть # ;
Past_shift ;
Impf_PastVrbAdv_V ;
PastAct ;

LEXICON Impf_Inf_V_shift_w/Pass
Impf_Inf_V_shift ;
+Inf+Pass:%<ться # ;
Past_shift''_Pass ;
PastAct_Pass ;

LEXICON Impf_Inf_shift_R
+Inf:%<ться # ;
Past_shift_R ;
Impf_PastVrbAdv_R ;
PastAct_R ;

LEXICON Impf_Inf_shift''_R
+Inf:%<ться # ;
Past_shift''_R ;
Impf_PastVrbAdv_R ;
PastAct_R ;

LEXICON Impf_Inf_shift''_R_безл.
+Inf:%<ться # ;
Past_shift''_R_безл. ;

LEXICON Perf_Inf_C_stem
+Inf:%<ть # ;
Past_stem ;
Perf_PastVrbAdv_C ;
PastAct ;

LEXICON Perf_Inf_C_stem_zero
+Inf:ну%<ть # ;
Past_stem_zero ;
Perf_PastVrbAdv_C ;
PastAct ;
:ну Perf_PastVrbAdv_V_Fac ;

LEXICON Perf_Inf_stem_zero_R
+Inf:ну%<ться # ;
Past_stem_zero_R ;
Perf_PastVrbAdv_R ;
PastAct_R ;

LEXICON Perf_Inf_C_stem_zero5
+Inf:ну%<ть # ;
Past_stem5 ;
Perf_PastVrbAdv_C ;
:ну Perf_PastVrbAdv_V_Fac ;
PastAct ;

LEXICON Perf_Inf_C_stem_zero[5]
+Inf:ну%<ть # ;
Past_stem[5] ;
Perf_PastVrbAdv_C ;
:ну Perf_PastVrbAdv_V_Fac ;
PastAct ;

LEXICON Perf_Inf_C_stem_zero56
+Inf:ну%<ть # ;
Past_stem5 ;
:ну Perf_PastVrbAdv_V ;
:ну PastAct ;

LEXICON Perf_Inf_C_stem_zero[56]
+Inf:ну%<ть # ;
Past_stem[5] ;
Perf_PastVrbAdv_C ;
PastAct ;
:ну Perf_PastVrbAdv_V_Fac ;
:ну PastAct_Fac ;

LEXICON Perf_Inf_C_stem_zero[56]_R
+Inf:ну%<ться # ;
Past_stem[5]_R ;
Perf_PastVrbAdv_R ;
PastAct_R ;
:ну Perf_PastVrbAdv_R_Fac ;
:ну PastAct_R_Fac ;

LEXICON Perf_Inf_C_stem_zero6
+Inf:ну%<ть # ;
Past_stem ;
:ну Perf_PastVrbAdv_V ;
:ну PastAct ;
