src/fst/morphology/stems/verbs.lexc
LEXICON Verb
клясть:кля́ нсв_b/c_клясть "weight: 1.8271568810615688" ;
зыбиться:зы́б нсв_a_R_зыбиться "weight: 1.3042781357812314" ;
зиждиться:зи́жд нсв_a_R_зиждиться "weight: 1.3042781357812314" ;
зыбить:зы́б нсв_a?_зыбить ;
клясться:кля́ нсв_b/c''_R_клясться ;
заклясть:закля́ св_b/c_-клясть ;
проклясть:про́кл св_b/c1_-клясть "weight: 3.2302774022373866" ;
заесть:за св_b_есть "weight: 1.429216872389531" ;
наесть:на св_b_есть ;
переесть:пере св_b_есть "weight: 1.1281868767255503" ;
доесть:до св_b_есть "weight: 1.8271568810615688" ;
недоесть:недо св_b_есть "weight: 2.8802353245449885" ;
поесть:по св_b_есть "weight: 1.6722549210758255" ;
проесть:про св_b_есть "weight: 2.149376175795488" ;
уесть:у св_b_есть ;
объесть:объ св_b_есть "weight: 2.0032481401172504" ;
надъесть:надъ св_b_есть ;
подъесть:подъ св_b_есть "weight: 1.3042781357812314" ;
разъесть:разъ св_b_есть "weight: 2.0312768637174936" ;
изъесть:изъ св_b_есть "weight: 2.8685495662197935" ;
съесть:съ св_b_есть "weight: 3.611774173694444" ;
отъесть:отъ св_b_есть "weight: 1.1281868767255503" ;
надоесть:надо св_нп_b_есть "weight: 3.218091988164948" ;
заклясться:закля́ св_b/c''_R_-клясться ;
поклясться:покля́ св_b/c''_R_-клясться ;
поднадоесть:поднадо св_нп_b_есть "weight: 1.429216872389531" ;
LEXICON LexicalizedParticiple
проклясть:про́кл св_b/c1_-клясть_Lxc "weight: 3.2302774022373866" ;
дать: св_b/c'_дать_Lxc "weight: 4.798479126304382" ;
задать:за́ св_b/c[1]_дать_Lxc "weight: 4.100158153125307" ;
предать:пре́ св_b/c[1]_дать_Lxc "weight: 3.8112339149643994" ;
подать:по́ св_b/c[1]_дать_Lxc "weight: 4.069698309359953" ;
